ko: 유포니엄 포함 액세서리: 청소용 키트 포함; 긱백 포함; 하드 케이스 포함; 라이어 홀더 포함; 마우스피스 포함; 숄더 스트랩 포함; 슬라이드 그리스 포함; 밸브 오일 포함; 기타
da: Medfølgende tilbehør til euphonium: Rengøringssæt medfølger; Gigbag medfølger; Hardcase medfølger; Nodeholder medfølger; Mundstykke medfølger; Skulderrem medfølger; Bøjlefedt medfølger; Ventilolie medfølger; Andet
lt-LT: Įtraukti eufonijos aksesuarų daiktai: Pridedamas valymo rinkinys; Pridedamas minkštas dėklas; Pridedamas kietas dėklas; Pridedamas lyros laikiklis; Pridedamas kandiklis; Pridedamas peties diržas; Pridedamas trauklės tepalas; Pridedama vožtuvų alyva; Kita
tr: Euphonium ile birlikte sunulan aksesuarlar: Temizlik kiti dahil; Gig bag dahil; Sert çanta dahil; Lir tutucu dahil; Ağızlık dahil; Omuz askısı dahil; Sürgü gresi dahil; Valf yağı dahil; Diğer
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับยูโฟเนียม: รวมชุดเครื่องมือทำความสะอาด; รวมกระเป๋า Gig Bag; รวมฮาร์ดเคส; รวมที่หนีบโน้ตเพลง; รวมปากเป่า; รวมสายสะพาย; รวมจาระบีทาสไลด์; รวมน้ำมันหยอดวาล์ว; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 上低音號隨附配件: 附清潔工具包; 附樂器袋; 附硬盒; 附譜夾座; 附吹嘴; 附肩帶; 附調音管油; 附活塞油; 其他
es: Accesorios incluidos para el eufonio: Kit de limpieza incluido; Funda de transporte incluida; Estuche rígido incluido; Soporte para lira incluido; Boquilla incluida; Correa para el hombro incluida; Grasa para bombas incluida; Aceite para pistones incluido; Otro
pt-BR: Acessórios do eufônio incluídos: Kit de limpeza incluído; Capa incluída; Estojo rígido incluído; Porta-lira incluído; Bocal incluído; Alça de ombro incluída; Graxa para pompa incluída; Óleo para válvulas incluído; Outro
en: Euphonium included accessories: Cleaning kit included; Gig bag included; Hard case included; Lyre holder included; Mouthpiece included; Shoulder strap included; Slide grease included; Valve oil included; Other
sv: Euphonium-tillbehör ingår: Rengöringskit ingår; Gigbag ingår; Hårt fodral ingår; Marschlyra ingår; Munstycke ingår; Axelrem ingår; Bygelfett ingår; Ventilolja ingår; Övrigt
nl: Eufonium meegeleverde accessoires: Schoonmaakkit inbegrepen; Gigbag inbegrepen; Hardcase inbegrepen; Lierhouder inbegrepen; Mondstuk inbegrepen; Schouderband inbegrepen; Schuifvet inbegrepen; Ventielolie inbegrepen; Overig
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru eufoniu: Kit de curățare inclus; Husă de transport inclusă; Cutie rigidă inclusă; Suport pentru liră inclus; Muștiuc inclus; Curea de umăr inclusă; Vaselină pentru culisă inclusă; Ulei pentru pistoane inclus; Altele
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo dodávané s eufóniom: Vrátane čistiacej súpravy; Vrátane prenosného puzdra; Vrátane pevného puzdra; Vrátane držiaka na lýru; Vrátane náustka; Vrátane popruhu na rameno; Vrátane maziva na znižce; Vrátane oleja na ventily; Iné
it: Accessori inclusi per l'eufonio: Kit di pulizia incluso; Borsa morbida inclusa; Custodia rigida inclusa; Supporto per lira incluso; Bocchino incluso; Tracolla inclusa; Grasso per pompe incluso; Olio per pistoni incluso; Altro
zh-CN: 次中音号配套配件: 包含清洁套件; 包含软包; 包含硬盒; 包含谱夹; 包含号嘴; 包含肩带; 包含滑管油; 包含活塞油; 其他
pl: Akcesoria w zestawie z eufonium: Zestaw do czyszczenia w komplecie; Pokrowiec w komplecie; Twardy futerał w komplecie; Uchwyt na lirę w komplecie; Ustnik w komplecie; Pasek na ramię w komplecie; Smar do suwaków w komplecie; Oliwka do wentyli w komplecie; Inne
hu: Eufónium tartozékok: Tisztítókészlet mellékelve; Puhatok mellékelve; Keménytok mellékelve; Líratartó mellékelve; Fúvóka mellékelve; Vállpánt mellékelve; Hangolócső-zsír mellékelve; Szelepolaj mellékelve; Egyéb
de: Im Lieferumfang des Euphoniums enthaltenes Zubehör: Reinigungsset inbegriffen; Gigbag inbegriffen; Hartschalenkoffer inbegriffen; Marschgabelhalter inbegriffen; Mundstück inbegriffen; Schultergurt inbegriffen; Zugfett inbegriffen; Ventilöl inbegriffen; Sonstige
pt-PT: Eufónio com acessórios incluídos: Kit de limpeza incluído; Saco de transporte incluído; Estojo rígido incluído; Suporte para lira incluído; Bocal incluído; Alça de ombro incluída; Massa para pompas incluída; Óleo para pistões incluído; Outro
fi: Eufoniumin mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Mukana puhdistussarja; Mukana keikkalaukku; Mukana kova kotelo; Mukana lyyrapidin; Mukana suukappale; Mukana olkahihna; Mukana vetorasva; Mukana venttiiliöljy; Muu
cs: Příslušenství k eufoniu: Včetně čisticí sady; Včetně gigbagu; Včetně pevného pouzdra; Včetně držáku na lyru; Včetně náustku; Včetně ramenního popruhu; Včetně maziva na snížec; Včetně oleje na ventily; Ostatní
nb: Euphonium inkludert tilbehør: Rengjøringssett inkludert; Gigbag inkludert; Hard koffert inkludert; Noteklypeholder inkludert; Munnstykke inkludert; Skulderstropp inkludert; Bøylefett inkludert; Ventilolje inkludert; Annet
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm kèn euphonium: Có kèm bộ vệ sinh; Có kèm bao đàn; Có kèm hộp cứng; Có kèm giá kẹp bản nhạc; Có kèm ống thổi; Có kèm dây đeo vai; Có kèm mỡ bôi trơn rãnh trượt; Có kèm dầu bôi trơn van; Khác
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за еуфониум: Включен комплект за почистване; Включен калъф; Включен твърд калъф; Включена поставка за лира; Включен мундщук; Включена презрамка; Включена смазка за цуг; Включено масло за клапи; Други
hr-HR: Priloženi pribor za eufonij: Uključen komplet za čišćenje; Uključena mekana torba; Uključen tvrdi kovčeg; Uključen držač za liru; Uključen usnik; Uključena traka za rame; Uključena mast za povlačak; Uključeno ulje za ventile; Ostalo
el: Αξεσουάρ που περιλαμβάνονται στο ευφώνιο: Περιλαμβάνεται κιτ καθαρισμού; Περιλαμβάνεται θήκη μεταφοράς; Περιλαμβάνεται σκληρή θήκη; Περιλαμβάνεται βάση λύρας; Περιλαμβάνεται επιστόμιο; Περιλαμβάνεται ιμάντας ώμου; Περιλαμβάνεται γράσο αντλιών; Περιλαμβάνεται λάδι εμβόλων; Άλλο
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za evfonij: Vključen komplet za čiščenje; Vključena mehka torba; Vključen trdi kovček; Vključen nosilec za liro; Vključen ustnik; Vključen naramni pas; Vključena mast za poteg; Vključeno olje za ventile; Drugo
ru: Аксессуары в комплекте с эвфониумом: Набор для чистки в комплекте; Мягкий чехол в комплекте; Жесткий футляр в комплекте; Держатель для лиры в комплекте; Мундштук в комплекте; Плечевой ремень в комплекте; Смазка для крон в комплекте; Масло для клапанов в комплекте; Другое
ja: ユーフォニアムに含まれるアクセサリー: クリーニングキット付き; ギグバッグ付き; ハードケース付き; ライヤーホルダー付き; マウスピース付き; ショルダーストラップ付き; スライドグリス付き; バルブオイル付き; その他
fr: Accessoires fournis avec l’euphonium: Kit de nettoyage inclus; Housse de transport incluse; Étui rigide inclus; Porte-lyre inclus; Embouchure incluse; Bandoulière incluse; Graisse pour coulisse incluse; Huile pour pistons incluse; Autre